Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1406.02
License; director; powers.

(1) The director may suspend, revoke, cancel, or refuse to issue or renew a license under the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act:

(a) If the applicant's or licensee's registration certificate issued pursuant to the International Registration Plan Act has been suspended, revoked, or canceled or the director refused to issue or renew such certificate;

(b) If the applicant or licensee is in violation of sections 75-392 to 75-3,100;

(c) If the applicant's or licensee's security has been canceled;

(d) If the applicant or licensee failed to provide additional security as required;

(e) If the applicant or licensee failed to file any report or return required by the motor fuel laws, filed an incomplete report or return required by the motor fuel laws, did not file any report or return required by the motor fuel laws electronically, or did not file a report or return required by the motor fuel laws on time;

(f) If the applicant or licensee failed to pay taxes required by the motor fuel laws due within the time provided;

(g) If the applicant or licensee filed any false report, return, statement, or affidavit, required by the motor fuel laws, knowing it to be false;

(h) If the applicant or licensee would no longer be eligible to obtain a license; or

(i) If the applicant or licensee committed any other violation of the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

(2) Prior to taking any action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the director shall notify and advise the applicant or licensee of the proposed action and the reasons for such action in writing, by regular United States mail, to his or her last-known business address as shown on the application or license. The notice shall also include an advisement of the procedures in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The applicant or licensee may, within thirty days after the mailing of the notice, petition the director in writing for a hearing to contest the proposed action. The hearing shall be commenced in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Department of Motor Vehicles. If a petition is filed, the director shall, within twenty days after receipt of the petition, set a hearing date at which the applicant or licensee may show cause why the proposed action should not be taken. The director shall give the applicant or licensee reasonable notice of the time and place of the hearing. If the director's decision is adverse to the applicant or licensee, the applicant or licensee may appeal the decision in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(4) Except as provided in subsection (2) of section 60-3,205 and subsection (8) of this section, the filing of the petition shall stay any action by the director until a hearing is held and a final decision and order is issued.

(5) Except as provided in subsection (2) of section 60-3,205 and subsection (8) of this section, if no petition is filed at the expiration of thirty days after the date on which the notification was mailed, the director may take the proposed action described in the notice.

(6) Except as provided in subsection (2) of section 60-3,205 and subsection (8) of this section, if, in the judgment of the director, the applicant or licensee has complied with or is no longer in violation of the provisions for which the director took action under this section, the director may reinstate the license without delay. An applicant for reinstatement, issuance, or renewal of a license within three years after the date of suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal to issue or renew shall submit a fee of one hundred dollars to the director. The director shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Cash Fund.

(7) Suspension of, revocation of, cancellation of, or refusal to issue or renew a license by the director shall not relieve any person from making or filing the reports or returns required by the motor fuel laws in the manner or within the time required.

(8) Any person who receives notice from the director of action taken pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall, within three business days, return such registration certificate and license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,198 to the department. If any person fails to return the registration certificate and license plates to the department, the department shall notify the Nebraska State Patrol that any such person is in violation of this section.

Laws 1998, LB 1056, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 563, § 38;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB358, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 47;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 75.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

International Registration Plan Act, see section 60-3,192.